Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.608, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Grant amount. (a) Each county is eligible to receive an annual grant of $7,500 for the following purposes: (1) to provide outreach to the county's veterans; (2) to assist in the reintegration of combat veterans into society; (3) to collaborate with other social service agencies, educational institutions, and other community organizations for the purposes of enhancing services offered to veterans; (4) to reduce homelessness among veterans; and (5) to enhance the operations of the county veterans service office. (b) In addition to the grant amount in paragraph (a), each county is eligible to receive an additional annual grant under this paragraph. The amount of each additional annual grant must be determined by the commissioner and may not exceed: (1) $0, if the county's veteran population is less than 1,000; (2) $2,500, if the county's veteran population is 1,000 or more but less than 3,000; (3) $5,000, if the county's veteran population is 3,000 or more but less than 5,000; (4) $7,500, if the county's veteran population is 5,000 or more but less than 10,000; (5) $10,000, if the county's veteran population is 10,000 or more but less than 20,000; (6) $15,000, if the county's veteran population is 20,000 or more but less than 30,000; or (7) $20,000, if the county's veteran population is 30,000 or more. (c) The Minnesota Association of County Veterans Service Officers is eligible to receive an annual grant of deleted text begin $100,000deleted text end new text begin $160,000new text end . The grant deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be used for administrative costs of the association, certification of mandated county veterans service officer training and accreditation, and costs associated with reintegration services.new text begin Up to $60,000 of this amount may be used to train technical assistance coordinators and for technical assistance coordinators to travel to consult with Minnesota counties on specific areas of expertise upon request. The Minnesota Association of County Veterans Service Officers executive board must select technical assistance coordinators, who are either county veterans service officers or assistant county veterans service officers, to serve for a minimum of one year.new text end new text begin (d) new text end The veteran population of each county shall be determined by the figure supplied by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, as adopted by the commissioner. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; VETERANS SERVICE OFFICE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $60,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to the Minnesota Association of County Veterans Service Officers under Minnesota Statutes, section 197.608, subdivision 6, paragraph (c). Of this amount, $20,000 is for a women veterans technical assistance coordinator, $20,000 is for a veteran suicide prevention technical assistance coordinator, and $20,000 is for a justice-involved veteran technical assistance coordinator. Any unencumbered balance in fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end